zh-TW: 梯形校正類型: 自動; 自動四角校正; 自動水平校正; 自動水平垂直校正; 自動垂直校正; 四點校正; 手動; 手動四角校正; 手動水平校正; 手動垂直校正; 無; 其他
en: Keystone correction type: Automatic; Automatic 4-corner; Automatic horizontal; Automatic horizontal & vertical; Automatic vertical; Four-point; Manual; Manual 4-corner; Manual horizontal; Manual vertical; None; Other
fr: Type de correction trapézoïdale: Automatique; Automatique 4 coins; Horizontal automatique; Horizontal et vertical automatique; Vertical automatique; Quatre points; Manuel; Manuel 4 coins; Horizontal manuel; Vertical manuel; Aucune; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta keystone korekcije: Automatsko; Automatska 4-kutna; Automatska horizontalna; Automatska horizontalna i vertikalna; Automatska vertikalna; Četverotočkasta; Ručno; Ručna 4-kutna; Ručna horizontalna; Ručna vertikalna; Nema; Ostalo
ja: キーストーン補正タイプ: オートマチック; 自動4コーナー; 自動水平; 自動水平・垂直; 自動垂直; 4ポイント; マニュアル; 手動4コーナー; 手動水平; 手動垂直; なし; その他
it: Tipo di correzione trapezoidale: Automatico; Automatico 4 angoli; Automatico orizzontale; Automatico orizzontale e verticale; Automatico verticale; Quattro punti; Manuale; Manuale 4 angoli; Manuale orizzontale; Manuale verticale; Nessuna; Altro
da: Keystone-korrektionstype: Automatisk; Automatisk 4-hjørner; Automatisk vandret; Automatisk vandret og lodret; Automatisk lodret; Firepunkt; Manuel; Manuel 4-hjørner; Manuel vandret; Manuel lodret; Ingen; Andet
sl-SI: Tip korekcije trapeza: Samodejno; Samodejna 4-kotna; Samodejna vodoravna; Samodejna vodoravna in navpična; Samodejna navpična; Štiritočkovna; Ročni; Ročna 4-kotna; Ročna vodoravna; Ročna navpična; Brez; Drugo
fi: Trapetsikorjauksen tyyppi: Automaattinen; Automaattinen 4 kulmaa; Automaattinen vaakasuora; Automaattinen vaaka- ja pystysuora; Automaattinen pystysuora; Neljä pistettä; Manuaalinen; Manuaalinen 4 kulmaa; Manuaalinen vaakasuora; Manuaalinen pystysuora; Ei mitään; Muu
bg-BG: Тип корекция на трапецовидно изкривяване: Автоматичен; Автоматична 4-ъгълна; Автоматична хоризонтална; Автоматична хоризонтална и вертикална; Автоматична вертикална; Четириточкова; Ръчен; Ръчна 4-ъгълна; Ръчна хоризонтална; Ръчна вертикална; Няма; Други
pl: Typ korekcji zniekształceń trapezowych: Automatyczne; Automatyczna 4-rogowa; Automatyczna pozioma; Automatyczna pozioma i pionowa; Automatyczna pionowa; Czteropunktowa; Ręczne; Ręczna 4-rogowa; Ręczna pozioma; Ręczna pionowa; Brak; Inne
sv: Trapetskorrigeringstyp: Automatisk; Automatisk 4-hörn; Automatisk horisontell; Automatisk horisontell och vertikal; Automatisk vertikal; Fyrapunkts; Manuell; Manuell 4-hörn; Manuell horisontell; Manuell vertikal; Inga; Övrigt
hu: Trapézkorrekció típusa: Automatikus; Automatikus 4 sarkas; Automatikus vízszintes; Automatikus vízszintes és függőleges; Automatikus függőleges; Négypontos; Manuális; Kézi 4 sarkas; Kézi vízszintes; Kézi függőleges; Egyik sem; Egyéb
zh-CN: 梯形校正类型: 自动; 自动四角; 自动水平; 自动水平和垂直; 自动垂直; 四点; 手动; 手动四角; 手动水平; 手动垂直; 无; 其他
es: Tipo de corrección trapezoidal: Automático; Automático de 4 esquinas; Horizontal automático; Horizontal y vertical automático; Vertical automático; Cuatro puntos; Manual; Manual de 4 esquinas; Horizontal manual; Vertical manual; Ninguno; Otros
nl: Keystone-correctietype: Automatisch; Automatisch 4-hoeken; Automatisch horizontaal; Automatisch horizontaal en verticaal; Automatisch verticaal; Vierpunts; Handmatig; Handmatig 4-hoeken; Handmatig horizontaal; Handmatig verticaal; Geen; Andere
lt-LT: Trapecinio iškraipymo korekcijos tipas: Automatinis; Automatinė 4 kampų; Automatinė horizontali; Automatinė horizontali ir vertikali; Automatinė vertikali; Keturių taškų; Rankinis; Rankinė 4 kampų; Rankinė horizontali; Rankinė vertikali; Nėra; Kita
nb: Type trapeskorreksjon: Automatisk; Automatisk 4-hjørne; Automatisk horisontal; Automatisk horisontal og vertikal; Automatisk vertikal; Firepunkt; Manuell; Manuell 4-hjørne; Manuell horisontal; Manuell vertikal; Ingen; Annet
ko: 키스톤 보정 유형: 자동; 자동 4모서리; 자동 수평; 자동 수평 및 수직; 자동 수직; 4점; 수동; 수동 4모서리; 수동 수평; 수동 수직; 없음; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de correção keystone: Automática; Automático de 4 cantos; Horizontal automático; Horizontal e vertical automático; Vertical automático; Quatro pontos; Manual; Manual de 4 cantos; Horizontal manual; Vertical manual; Nenhum; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de correção keystone: Automático; Automática de 4 cantos; Horizontal automática; Horizontal e vertical automática; Vertical automática; Quatro pontos; Manual; Manual de 4 cantos; Horizontal manual; Vertical manual; Nenhum; Outro
ro-RO: Tip corecție keystone: Automată; Automat pe 4 colțuri; Automat orizontal; Automat orizontal și vertical; Automat vertical; Pe patru puncte; Manual; Manual pe 4 colțuri; Manual orizontal; Manual vertical; Niciuna; Altele
el: Τύπος διόρθωσης τραπεζοειδούς παραμόρφωσης: Αυτόματος; Αυτόματη 4 γωνιών; Αυτόματη οριζόντια; Αυτόματη οριζόντια και κάθετη; Αυτόματη κάθετη; Τεσσάρων σημείων; Μη αυτόματος; Χειροκίνητη 4 γωνιών; Χειροκίνητη οριζόντια; Χειροκίνητη κάθετη; Καμία; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ korekcie lichoběžníkového skreslenia: Automatický; Automatická 4-rohová; Automatická horizontálna; Automatická horizontálna a vertikálna; Automatická vertikálna; Štvorbodová; Manuálne ovládanie; Manuálna 4-rohová; Manuálna horizontálna; Manuálna vertikálna; Žiadny; Iné
ru: Тип коррекции трапецеидальных искажений: Автоматический; Автоматическая 4-угольная; Автоматическая горизонтальная; Автоматическая горизонтальная и вертикальная; Автоматическая вертикальная; Четырёхточечная; Ручной; Ручная 4-угольная; Ручная горизонтальная; Ручная вертикальная; Нет; Другой
tr: Keystone düzeltme tipi: Otomatik; Otomatik 4 köşe; Otomatik yatay; Otomatik yatay ve dikey; Otomatik dikey; Dört nokta; Manuel; Manuel 4 köşe; Manuel yatay; Manuel dikey; Hiçbiri; Diğer
vi: Loại hiệu chỉnh hình thang: Tự động; Tự động 4 góc; Tự động ngang; Tự động ngang và dọc; Tự động dọc; Bốn điểm; Thủ công; Thủ công 4 góc; Thủ công ngang; Thủ công dọc; Không có; Khác
th: ประเภทการแก้ไขคีย์สโตน: อัตโนมัติ; อัตโนมัติ 4 มุม; อัตโนมัติแนวนอน; อัตโนมัติแนวนอนและแนวตั้ง; อัตโนมัติแนวตั้ง; สี่จุด; มือเข็น; ปรับเอง 4 มุม; ปรับเองแนวนอน; ปรับเองแนวตั้ง; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ korekce lichoběžníku: Automatická; Automatická 4rohová; Automatická horizontální; Automatická horizontální a vertikální; Automatická vertikální; Čtyřbodová; Ruční; Manuální 4rohová; Manuální horizontální; Manuální vertikální; Žádný; Jiné
de: Trapezkorrekturtyp: Automatisch; Automatisch 4-Ecken; Automatisch horizontal; Automatisch horizontal und vertikal; Automatisch vertikal; Vier-Punkt; Manuell; Manuell 4-Ecken; Manuell horizontal; Manuell vertikal; Keine; Sonstiges